District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.80

Foreign corporations — Issuance of certificate of revocation.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 296, Pub. L. 87-569, § 80
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.80.
1981 Ed., § 29-581.
1973 Ed., § 29-1080.